Hawaii statutes.
§226-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"A-95 Clearinghouse" means the agency
or agencies designated to carry out the procedures established pursuant to
federal directive A-95 whereby certain applications for federal funds are
reviewed and affected agencies are notified of the proposed applications.

"Advisory committee" means the
committee established in section [226-55] to advise and assist in the
formulation of the state functional plans.

"Ahupuaa" means a traditional native
Hawaiian resource and behavioral management system that ensures respect for the
air, land, water, and other scarce natural resources that make life sustainable
from the mountains to the sea.

"Conform", "in conformance with
this chapter" or "be in conformance with the overall theme, goals,
objectives and policies," for the purposes of sections 226-52, [226-55],
and [226-59], means the weighing of the overall theme, goals, objectives and
policies of this chapter and a determination that an action, decision, rule or
state program is consistent with the overall theme, and fulfills one or more of
the goals, objectives, or policies of this chapter.

"County agency" means any department,
office, board, or commission of the county.

"County development plan" means a
relatively detailed plan for an area or region within a county to implement the
objectives and policies of a county general plan.

"County general plan" means the
comprehensive long-range plan or development plan, if any, which has been
adopted by ordinance or resolution by a county council.

"Federal agency" means any federal
department, office, board, or commission.

"Functional plan" means a plan
setting forth the policies, statewide guidelines, and priorities within a
specific field of activity, when such activity or program is proposed,
administered, or funded by any agency of the State.

"Guidelines" means a stated course of
action which is desirable and should be followed unless a determination is made
that it is not the most desirable in a particular case; thus, a guideline may
be deviated from without penalty or sanction.

"Hawaii state plan" means a
long-range comprehensive plan, including the overall theme, goals, objectives,
policies, priority guidelines, and implementation mechanisms established in
this chapter.

"Kanaka maoli" means native
Hawaiians.

"Office" means the office of
planning.

"Petroleum" includes crude oil or any
fraction thereof which is liquid at standard conditions of temperature and
pressure (60 degrees Fahrenheit and 14.7 pounds per square inch absolute).

"Policy council". DELETED.

"Priority guidelines" means those
guidelines which shall take precedence when addressing areas of statewide
concern.

"Socio-cultural advancement" means
those collective efforts, through governmental or private organizations or
both, to improve the community or social well-being by carrying out the
objectives and policies as related to: housing, health, education, social
services, leisure, individual rights, culture, and public safety.

"State agency" means any department,
office, board, or commission of the State, or the University of Hawaii.

"State programs" means a combination
of actions and activities undertaken by any state agency that are designed,
coordinated, and executed to achieve an objective or set of objectives and
policies within defined areas of concern.

"Sustainability" means achieving the
following:

(1) Respect of the culture, character, beauty, and
history of the State's island communities;

(2) Striking a balance between economic, social,
community, and environmental priorities; and

(3) Meeting the needs of the present without
compromising the ability of future generations to meet their own needs. [L
1978, c 100, pt of §2; am L 1984, c 236, §2; am L 1986, c 276, §2; am L 1987, c
336, §4(1); am L 1988, c 70, §2; am L 1996, c 299, §3; am L 2003, c 3, §6; am L
2011, c 181, §3; am L 2015, c 38, §1]

Note

"Policy
council" as established by former §226-53 was deleted by L 1991, c 76.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next